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−DIAGNOSTICS VARIABLEGEARRATIOSTEERING
DI−409

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

DTC C 1561 / 61 LockMechanismMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
When the VGRS ECU detects a malfunction in the lock mechanism, it turns the warning light on, records
the DTC, and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1561/61
The system detects that the LG terminal voltage is equal to
batteryvoltagex0.4 ± 3V,or that theLGterminal voltage is
outside the rangeofbatteryvoltagex0.6 ± 3Vfor1.2sec.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check the position of the VGRS ECU connectors.

CHECK:
Check that VGRS ECU connectors are properly connected to the ECU.
OK:

Connection is good.

NG DTC C1561/61 is detected because the connec-
tor is disconnected or is likely to be discon-
nected. Connect the connector correctly.

OK

2 Check for an open or short circuit in the harness and connector (See page
IN−38).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the VGRS ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals MV and LG of the
VGRS ECU connector.
OK:

1 to 100 �

CHECK:
Check continuity between terminals MV and LG of the VGRS
ECU and body ground.
OK:

No continuity

NG Replace VGRS actuator.

OK

Replace VGRS ECU.


